Florida, session 2026, HB1551.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 768.1258, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
768.1258 Limitation of actions against firearm
manufacturers.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Authorized user recognition technology" means a
mechanism, device, or technology applied to a firearm which
prevents a user not authorized by the firearm owner from firing
the firearm.
(b) "External manual safety" means a manually operated
mechanism that, when engaged, blocks the firearm trigger from
functioning.
(c) "Firearm" has the same meaning as in s. 790.001.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1551-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1551 2026
(d) "Loaded chamber indicator" means a mechanism or
feature intended to indicate to the user that a cartridge is in
the firing chamber of a firearm.
(e) "Magazine disconnect mechanism" means a mechanism that
prevents a semiautomatic firearm from firing when the detachable
magazine is not fully inserted in the firearm.
(2) In a products liability action involving a firearm, a
firearm manufacturer is not liable under a theory of defective
product design, failure to warn, negligence, strict liability,
or other claims based on the absence or presence of any design
feature, functionality, safety mechanism, or performance
standard that is not required by federal law as a condition for
the lawful manufacture, sale, import, or receipt of the firearm,
including, but not limited to:
(a) A magazine disconnect mechanism;
(b) A loaded chamber indicator;
(c) Authorized user recognition technology; or
(d) An external manual safety, including, but not limited
to, a hinged, pivoting, or tabbed trigger safety.
(3) This section does not limit liability for a firearm
manufacturer in cases in which the claimant establishes that the
firearm contained an actual manufacturing or design defect or
failed to operate in a manner consistent with the manufacturer's
express warranties or representations.
(4) This section shall apply to causes of action filed
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1551-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1551 2026
after the effective date of this act.
Section 2. The Division of Law Revision is directed to
replace the phrase "the effective date of this act" wherever it
occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1551-01-c1